synthesisSoftware/libespeak-NG/dictsource/sd_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
//  phoneme rules for Sindhi
// Letter group - l01: Vowels

.replace
٠	0
١	1
٢	2
٣	3
٤	4
٥	5
٦	6
٧	7
٨	8
٩	9
ی	ي
ہ	ه

// vowel signs, alif acts as consonants  at start of word if these follow
.L01  َ ِ ُ و ي ع ا ے 

// Consonants
.L02  ب ٻ ڀ پ ت ٿ ٺ ث ج جھ ڄ چ ڇ ح خ د ڌ ڊ ڏ ذ ر ڙ ڙھ ز س ش ص ض ط ظ غ ف ڦ ق ڪ ک گ ڳ گھ ل م ن ڻ ڃ ه ھ ء

// VOWELS

.group َ
	َ	a
	َي	E
	َے	E
	َو 	O
	َع	a:

.group ِ
	ِ	I
	ِي	i:
	ِع	i:

.group ُ
	ُ	U
	ُو	u:
	ُع	O

.group ھ
	ھ	hV
	ھ(L01	h
ھ (l01	h

.group ٰ
	ٰ	a:

.group ا
	ا	a:
	_) ا (L01   // Acts like Consonants if followed by a vowel but is silent.
	_) ا	a
	_)او	u:
_)اي	e:
	ائ (L02	a:I
	افتتاح	,ItIt'a:h
	اسلام	,Isl'a:m
	_) انسان	Ins'a:n
	اً(_S2	'an
	_) افسر	,afs'aR
	_) اتفاق	,ItIf'a:q
	_) ابتدا	'Ibt,Ida:
	_) اعت	'e:tI
	_) اضاف	Iz'a:f
	استثن	,Ist'asn
	اجتماع	,IJtIm'a:
	استحصال	,Ist,e:S:'a:l
	_) امنگ	Um'ang
	انعام	In'a:m
	امتحان	,ImtIh'a:n
	الزام	,Ilz'a:m
	اشتہار	,IStIh'a:R
	اصول	Us.'u:l
	اعلان	e:l'a:n
	اعزاز	e:z'a:z
	انقلاب	,InqIl'a:b
	اصلاح	,Is.l'a:h
	امداد	,Imd'a:d
	@) ات (_S2	'a:t
	_) انتظ	'Int,Iz.
	_) اخت (L02	,IxtI
	_) اقت (L02	,IqtI
	_) اح (L02	'Eh
	_) است (L02	,IstI
	_) ارت (L02	,IRtI

.group آ
	آ	a:
	آتش	'a:tIS


.group ع
	ع	a:
	عا	a:
	_) ع	a
	عنوان	Unv'a:n
	_) عمر	'UmR
	L02) عی (_	'ai:
	علیحد	'alEhd
	عِ	I
	عُ	U

.group و
	و	o:
	وُ	vU
	وٗ	u:
	و (L01	v
	_) و	vV
	 وع (_	u:
	وّ	vv
	_L02L02L02)و(L02	u:

.group ي
	ي	e:
	ي(L01	j
	_)ي	jV
	يع(_	i:
	@)ي	i:
	يٰ	a:
	ي(_ٿ	e:

.group ے		// yeh barree
	ے	e:

.group ۂ
	ۂ	'ae:

// with hamza
.group ئ
	ئ

.group ٗ
	ٗ	u:

.group ؤ
	ؤ	aU   // ??

.group أ
	أ	// ??


// CONSONANTS

.group ب
	ب	bV
	ب (L01	b'	
	بّ	bbV
	بّ (L01	bb
	_) بگڑ	bIg'ar
	_) بگڑ (L01	b'Igr
	_) بجھ	b'UJh
	بغاوت	b,aQa:v'at
	بزرگ	b'UzUr,g
	_) بدل (L02	bad'al

.group ڀ
	ڀ	bV
	ڀ(L01	b

.group پ
	پ	pV
	پ (L01	p

.group ت
	ت	t[V
	ت(L01	t[
	تّ	t[:V
	تّ(L01	t[:

.group ٿ
	ٿ	TV
	ٿ(L01	T

.group ٽ
	ٽ	t.V
	ٽ(L01	t.

.group ٹ
	ٹ	t.V
	ٹ (L01	t.

.group ٺ
	ٺ	t.#V
	ٺ(L01	t.#

.group ث
	ث	sV
	ث (L01	s
	ثّ	ssV
ثّ (L01	ss

.group ج
	ج	JV
	ج (L01	J
	جّ	JJV
	جّ (L01	JJ
	_) جوا	J'ava:
	جانب	J'a:nIb
	_) جنس	J'Ins
	_) جمل	J'Uml
	_) جہ (L02	J'Eh
	_) جدا	J'Uda:

.group ڄ
	ڄ	JV
	ڄ(L01	J

.group جھ
	جھ	J#V
	جھ(L01	J#

.group چ
	چ	cV
	چ (L01	c
	چّ	ccV
	چّ (L01	cc
	_) چہ (L02	c'Eh

.group ڇ
	ڇ	c#V
	ڇ(L01	c#

.group ح
	ح	hV
	ح (L01	h
	ح (_	'ah
	L01) ح (_	h
	_) حوال	hav'a:l

.group خ
	خ	xV
	خ (L01	x
	@) خ (ت	x
	خّ	xxV
	خّ (L01	xx
	_) خوش	x'US
	_) خود	x'Ud
	_) خیا	x'aja:


.group د
	د	dV
	د (L01	d
	دّ (L01	d:
	درخواست	d,aRxv'a:st
	دیا(_	d'i:;a:
	درج	d'aRJ
	دیوا	d'i:va:
	دفاع	d'Ifa:
	_) دہ (L02	d'Eh
	دلچسپ	d,Ilc'asp

.group ڌ
	ڌ	d#V
	ڌ(L01	d#

.group ڏ
	ڏ	d.V
	ڏ(L01	d.

.group ڊ
	ڊ	d.V
	ڊ(L01	d.

.group ڍ
	ڍ	d.#V
	ڍ(L01	d.#

.group ڈ
	ڈ	dV
	ڈھ	dhV
	ڈ (L01	d:
	ڈھ (L01	d:h
	ڈّ	d:d:V
	ڈّ (L01	d:d
	ڈھونڈ	d:h'u:nd
	@) ڈز (_	d:z

.group ذ
	ذ	zV
	ذ(L01	z

.group ر
	ر	RV
	ر (L01	R
	رّ	RRV
	رّ (l01	RR
	@) ر (ٹ	R
	@) ر (ڈ	R
	@) ردہ (_	Rd,a
	@) ر (چ	R
	_) رہ (L02	R'Eh
	_) رخ	R'Ux
	@) ر (د	R
	_) رفت	R'af@t

.group ڙ
	ڙ	r.V
	ڙ(L01	r.

.group ڙھ
	ڙھ	r.hV
	ڙھ(L01	r.h

.group ڑ
	ڑ	r:V
	ڑ (L01	r:
	ڑّ	r:r:V
	ڑّ (L01	r:r:
	ڑھ	r:hV
	ڑھ (L01	r:h

.group ز
	ز	zV
	ز (L01	z
	زّ	zzV
	زّ (L01	zz
	_) زند	z'Ind
	_) زہ (L02	z'Eh
	_) زلزل	z,alz'al

.group ٻ
	ٻ	bV
	ٻ(L01	b

.group س
	س	sV
	س (L01	s
	سّ	ssV
	سّ (L01	ss
	_) سرخ	s'URx
	L02L02)ستان	Ista:n
	_) سلسل	s'Ils,Il
	_) ستار	sIt'a:R
	@) س (ٹ	s
	سیکھ	s'i:kh
	@) س (ت	s
	_) سپرد	sUp'URd
	_) سہ (L02	s'Eh
	سرگرم	s,aRg'aRm
	_)سنڌ	sIndh

.group ش
	ش	SV
	ش (L01	S
	شّ	SSV
	شّ (L01	SS
	_) شعب	S'Ob
	شاعر	Sa:'a:IR
	_) شعرا	S'ORa:
	_) شعل	S'Ol
	@) ش (ت	S
	_) شخص	S'axs.
	_) شہ (L02	S'Eh
	شرمند	S,aRm'Ind

.group ص
	ص	s.V
	ص (L01	s.
	صّ	ssV
	صّ (L01	ss
	صو(ب	s.'u:

.group ض
	ض	zV
	ض (L01	z
	ضّ	zzv
	ضّ (L01	zz

.group ط
	ط	tV
	طھ	t#V
		ط (L01	t
	طھ (L01	t#
	طّ	ttV
	طّ (L01	tt

.group ظ
	ظ	z.V
	ظ (L01	z.
	ظّ	z.z.V
	ظّ (L01	z.z.

.group غ
	غ	QV
	غ (L01	Q
	غّ	QQV
	غّ (L01	QQ

.group ف
	ف	fV
	ف (L01	f
	فّ	ffV
	فّ (L01	ff
	_) فہ (L02	f'Eh
	فلم	f'Ilm

.group ڦ
	ڦ	p#V
	ڦ(L01	p#

.group ق
	ق	qV
	ق (L01	q
	قّ	qqV
	قّ (L01	qq
	قاعد	q'a:jd
	_) قسط	q'Ist
	_) قیا	q'aja:

.group ک
	ک	k#V
	ک(L01	k#

.group ڪ
	ڪ	kV
	ڪ(L01	k

.group گ
	گ	gV
	گ (L01	g
	گّ	ggV
	گّ (L01	gg
	_) گرفت	g'IRIft
	_) گزر	gUz'aR
	_) گزر (L01	gUzR
	گمشد	g'UmS,Ud
	_) گھما	gh'Uma:
	_) گہ (L02	g'Eh
	گزارش	gUz'a:RIS

.group ڳ
	ڳ	gV
	ڳ(L01	g

.group گھ
	گھ	g#V
	گھ(L01	g#

.group ڱ
	ڱ	N-V
	ڱ(L01	N-

.group ل
	ل	lV
	ل (L01	l
	لّ	llV
	لّ (L01	ll
	لکھ	l'Ikh
	_) لہ (L02	l'Eh

.group م
	م	mV
	م (L01	m
	مّ	mmV
	مّ (L01	mm
	مظاہر	mUz.'a:hIR
	مسجد	m'asJ,Id
	مشرق	m'aSR,Iq
	مقدم	mUq'adm
	مسلم	m'Usl,Im
	مسلما	mUs'alm,a:
	@) م (پ	m
	منزل	m'anz,Il
	@) م (ب	m
	محقق	mUh'aqIq
	منظر	m,anz.'aR
	محفل	m'Ehf,Il
	محسن	m'o:hs,In
	مجرم	m'UJR,Im
	منظور	m,anz.'u:R
	ملزم	m'Ulz,Im
	مغرب	m'aQR,Ib
	متحد	mUt'ahId
	_) مہ (L02	m'Eh
	مخالف	mUx'a:lIf
	مخالفت	m,Uxa:lIf'at
	مطالب	mUt'a:lIb
	موجود	mo:J'u:d
	متصل	mUt'as.Il
	مخبر	m'Uxb,IR
	ملحق	m'Ulh,Iq
	مذہب	m,aDh'ab

.group ن
	ن	nV
	ن (L01	n
	@) ن (گ	n
	@) ن (د	n
	@)ن(ڌ	n
	@)ن(ڍ	n
	@) ن (ب	n
	@) ن (س	n
	نّ	nnV
	نّ (L01	nn
	@) ن (چ	n
	@) ن (پ	n
	@) نچل	n'Icl
	نشان	nIS'a:n
	@) ن (ڈ	n
	_) نظر	naz.'aR
	_) نظام	nIz.'a:m
	_) نہ (L02	n'h
	L01) نٹ	n't:
	نھ	nh
	_) نوا	n'ava:
	_) نما	n'Uma:
	_) نماز	nam'a:z

.group ڃ
	ڃ	n^V
	ڃ(L01	n^

.group ڻ
	ڻ	n.V
	ڻ(L01	n.

.group ء
	ء	

.group ئ
	ئ	
	L01) ئ (L02	'I

.group ه
	ه	HV
	ه(L01	H
	_)ه(ند	hI


.group ّ
	ّ	:

.group ً
	ً	an


// Common symbols

.group
	$	do:l@R
	,	sVkat:Vh	// 	Sakata سکتہ
		!	f'iJa:ja	//Fijaya	فجائیہ
	;	w'ak't'a	//Waqfa	وقفہ
	:	r'a:b'tah//Rabtar 	رابطہ
	?	saw'a:l'i:ja:n'is'a:nV	// Sawaliya Nishan	سوالیہ نشان
	%	f'i:sVd	//Fisad	فیصد

 

.group 0xe0a4  // devanagari
	0xe0a4  _^_NE  // switch to Nepali voice
.group 0xe0a5  // devanagari
	0xe0a5  _^_NE
